Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 2. Board for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

§ 51.5-61.
Appointment, terms and qualifications of members of Board; eligibility for reappointment; quorum.

The Board for the Blind and Vision Impaired is continued. The Board shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years. No person shall be eligible to serve more than two successive terms, provided that a person heretofore or hereafter appointed to fill a vacancy may serve two additional successive terms. Vacancies occurring on the Board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. All appointments hereunder shall be made without reference to party affiliations, but solely on account of the fitness of the appointees to discharge their duties as members of the Board. The membership of the Board, however, shall at all times include four persons who are blind. Four members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any lawful business. Annually, the Board shall elect one of its blind members as chairman, who shall preside at its meetings and shall have power to call meetings when he deems it advisable.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-162, 63-163; 1954, c. 71; 1962, c. 161; 1966, c. 43; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-68, 63.1-69; 1980, c. 4; 1984, c. 498; 1988, c. 125; 1995, c. 392; 2000, c. 498; 2002, c. 747.

§ 51.5-62.
Powers and duties of Board; form of materials.

The Board shall exercise the following general powers and duties:

Advise the Governor, the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, the Commissioner, and the General Assembly on the delivery of public services to and the protection of the rights of persons with disabilities on matters relating to this title, and on such other matters as the Governor, Secretary, Commissioner, or the General Assembly may request; and

Review and comment on policies, budgets and requests for appropriations for the Department prior to their submission to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Governor and on applications for federal funds.

Material submitted by the Commissioner for review and comment by the Board, when practicable, shall be in the medium or format suitable for review by each member of the Board.

History.

1992, c. 755, § 63.1-68.1; 1995, c. 392; 2002, c. 747.

§ 51.5-63.
Board to administer institutional fund.

The Board is authorized to create and hold an institutional fund for its exclusive use and purposes into which it may deposit the proceeds of any gift, grant, bequest, allotment, or devise of any nature received from private sources. Such fund shall be subject to the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.). The fund and the income from such fund shall not be subject to the provisions of §

2.2-1802

. The availability of such fund shall not be taken into consideration in, nor used to reduce, state appropriations or payments, but such funds shall be used in accordance with the wishes of the donors thereof to strengthen the services rendered to the blind and vision impaired of this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-167.1; 1966, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-74; 1980, c. 4; 1989, c. 267; 1992, c. 755; 2002, c. 747; 2008, c. 184.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§ 55-268.11 et seq.)” was changed to “Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.)” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 184 substituted “Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§ 55-268.11 et seq.)” for “Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act (§ 55-268.1 et seq.)” at the end of the second sentence.